Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 11. Community Service Areas

§ 816.
Access roads; State aid; application.

When after hearing on a petition or on their own motion, the selectboard finds that the convenience of the inhabitants and the public good require that a highway be laid out or altered to provide access to a recreational, industrial, or community service area and that the estimated costs of taking land for constructing the highway exceed the amount available to the town for highway construction for the preceding two years, the selectboard may apply in writing to the Board for additional money to construct the highway.
A “community service” area is one having an institution or facility for providing legally authorized educational, social, or welfare services to the public such as schools, hospitals, medical centers, or nursing homes.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 817.
Application; contents.

In its application under section 816 of this title, the selectboard shall show:

the general location of the proposed highway;

the nature and ownership of lands to be affected;

the plans for the development of the area to be served by the highway;

the anticipated effect of the business or facility to be served on the economy of the town and the State and on the health, safety, transportation, education, and convenience of the public;

the consistency of the plans with town, regional, and State planning and zoning requirements;

if the town does not have a comprehensive plan or a zoning ordinance, any other provisions for regulating the use of land adjacent to the highway;

the land dedicated and funds available from town taxes and private contributions for acquiring land and constructing the highway;

the financial arrangements and responsibility of the person or municipality proposing to construct the facility in the area;

what other town boards and officials have been consulted relative to the proposed development and their comments and criticisms; and

all other facts reasonably pertinent to establish the necessity for laying out and constructing the proposed highway.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 818.
Transportation Board; action.

When the Board receives an application for additional State money for constructing an access road, it shall immediately cause studies and estimates to be made to determine whether the proposed highway can be constructed according to accepted engineering standards on or near the proposed location and the cost, and whether the plans for the area, according to accepted engineering and other standards, adequately provide for vehicular and other traffic, for parking, for public utilities, and for emergency services.
Upon completion of the studies, the Board shall send at least two copies of its report and recommendations to the applicant town and, upon request, to the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 819.
Other investigation.

The applicant town should also consult with such other agencies or departments of State government, including the Agency of Commerce and Community Development, the Department of Health, and the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, as may be necessary to furnish the General Assembly with complete information as to the effect of the proposed highway and the development of the facilities upon the community and the State. Whenever a town informs one of those departments or agencies that it has applied for funds under this subchapter and needs assistance to develop the information needed to support the advisability of constructing the highway, that department or agency promptly shall investigate the proposal and provide a complete report to the town. Upon request, a copy shall be provided to the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

2021, No. 20

, § 98.